Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB57.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Affiliate" means any person, partnership, or corporation that controls, is controlled by, or is under
common control with, a utility;
(b) "Authority" means the Kentucky Nuclear Energy Development Authority established in Section 4 of
this Act;
(c) "Combined operating license" means a license issued by the United States Nuclear Regulatory
Commission pursuant to 10 C.F.R. sec. 52.71 et seq., or other licensing frameworks as may be
adopted in federal regulations by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission for advanced
nuclear generating reactors, that enables its holder to construct and operate a nuclear power plant at
a specific site;
(d) "Construction permit" means a permit issued by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission
pursuant to 10 C.F.R. pt. 50 that enables its holder to construct a nuclear power plant at a specific
site;
(e) "Early site permit" means a permit issued by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission
pursuant to 10 C.F.R. sec. 52.12 et seq. that enables its holder to secure federal site approval for a
nuclear power plant site prior to seeking an operating reactor license from the United States Nuclear
Regulatory Commission;
(f) "Eligible applicant" means any utility or any affiliate of a utility and any current or prospective
customer of a utility that is acting in partnership or collaboration with the utility or the affiliate;
(g) "Generation III Plus" means the generation of nuclear reactor design following Generation III that
incorporates passive and other safety measures and design improvements not included in previous
nuclear reactor designs;
(h) "Generation IV" means the nuclear reactor designs identified and selected by the Generation IV
International Forum as follows:
1. Sodium-cooled fast reactors;
2. Gas-cooled fast reactors;
3. Lead-cooled fast reactors;
4. Molten salt reactors;
5. Supercritical water-cooled reactors; and
6. Very high temperature reactors;
(i) "Nuclear energy generating facility" means a facility containing a nuclear reactor of Generation III
Plus, Generation IV, or later design that produces electricity, at least some of which is sold to the
public; and
(j) "Utility" means a person, firm, corporation, association, cooperative corporation, federally owned
electric utility corporation, or municipal corporation who owns, controls, operates, or manages any
facility used or to be used for or in connection with the generation, production, transmission, or
distribution of electricity to or for the public for compensation.
(2) (a) The authority shall create and implement the Nuclear Reactor Site Readiness Pilot Program to
facilitate the application for and procurement of early site permits, construction permits, or combined
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
operating licenses from the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission for the siting of new
nuclear energy generating facilities in the Commonwealth.
(b) Upon recommendation of the authority, the General Assembly may award eligible applicants grant
funding of up to one-third (1/3) of the actual costs incurred in applying for and procuring an early
site permit, construction permit, or combined operating license, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars ($25,000,000) per project.
(c) The authority shall:
1. Create grant applications;
2. Establish grant applicant eligibility requirements;
3. Establish objective scoring criteria to evaluate grant applications;
4. Review any partnership agreement between eligible applicants for validity and completeness
and to ensure that the agreement provides for the surety bonding or similar security
requirements required under subsection (4) of this section and repayment responsibilities for
all partners in the event that forfeiture and repayment of grant funding is required under
subsection (5) of this section; and
5. Make determinations on applicant eligibility and evaluate and score each eligible applicant's
grant application, in consultation with the Energy and Environment Cabinet's Office of
Energy Policy and the Cabinet for Economic Development, according to the following
criteria:
a. The location, suitability, and previous use of the site for which the early site permit,
construction permit, or combined operating license is sought;
b. The economic condition of the region where the new nuclear energy generating facility
would be located;
c. The economic impact that the siting of a new nuclear energy generating facility would
have in the region;
d. Whether, in relation to other pending or past grant applications or awards under this
section, the proposed site would be located in a geographically diverse region of the
Commonwealth;
e. The amount of additional investment being made in the proposed project by the eligible
applicant or applicants or other sources; and
f. Any other criteria the authority deems appropriate to evaluate.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any information, data, or records provided as
part of an application for grant funding under this section shall be confidential and exempt from
disclosure under the requirements of KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(3) (a) To be eligible to apply for grant funding under this section, eligible applicants must demonstrate
that:
1. The community where the proposed site of the new nuclear energy generating facility would
be located has applied for a nuclear-ready community designation under KRS 164.2804; and
2. There would be material benefits, including but not limited to the provision of electric utility
service, job creation, and return on investment to the ratepayers and the impacted community
to be served by the proposed new nuclear energy generating facility.
(b) To be eligible to be awarded grant funding under this section, eligible applicants must demonstrate
that the community where the proposed site of the new nuclear energy generating facility would be
located has received a nuclear-ready community designation under KRS 164.2804.
(4) In exchange for any grant funding authorized by the General Assembly under this section, the utility or the
affiliate and any partners it may have shall procure a surety bond or other similar security acceptable to the
authority in the amount of the grant funding to be awarded. The surety bond or similar security shall bind
the principal or principals and the surety to the Commonwealth to repay all grant moneys forfeited
pursuant to subsection (5) of this section. The surety bond or other similar security shall be continuous and

CHAPTER 56 3
remain in effect until the completion of the construction of the nuclear energy generating facility for which
the permit or license was issued or upon the repayment of all forfeited grant funds pursuant to subsection
(5) of this section. Any cancellation of the bond or similar security shall not occur until thirty (30) days
written notice is provided by the provider of the surety bond or other similar security to the authority.
(5) A grant funding recipient and all of its partners shall forfeit and repay all grant funding awarded under
this section within sixty (60) days of:
(a) If it has not already done so, failing to apply to the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission for
an early site permit within one (1) year of receiving any grant funding under this section;
(b) Failing to apply to the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission for a construction permit or
combined operating license for a nuclear energy generating facility, or for a necessary license issued
under other licensing frameworks that may be adopted in federal regulations by the United States
Nuclear Regulatory Commission for advanced nuclear generating reactors, for which an early site
permit was awarded within five (5) years of obtaining the early site permit. The authority may
approve extensions of the deadline established by this paragraph in one (1) year increments for good
cause shown;
(c) Failing to commence construction of the nuclear energy generating facility for which all necessary
permits or licenses have been awarded by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission within
ten (10) years of obtaining all necessary permits or licenses. The authority may approve extensions of
the deadline established by this paragraph in one (1) year increments for good cause shown; or
(d) The transferring of the entirety of a utility's or affiliate's interest in the early site permit, the
construction permit, or the combined operating license to an entity other than another utility prior to
the commencement of construction of the nuclear energy generating facility for which a permit or
license was awarded, unless the authority finds that the transfer is in the best interest of the
Commonwealth.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 278 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Combined operating license" means a license issued by the United States Nuclear Regulatory
Commission pursuant to 10 C.F.R. sec. 52.71 et seq. that enables its holder to construct and operate a
nuclear power plant at a specific site;
(b) "Construction permit" means a permit issued by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission
pursuant to 10 C.F.R. pt. 50 that enables its holder to construct a nuclear power plant at a specific
site;
(c) "Early site permit" means a permit issued by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission
pursuant to 10 C.F.R. sec. 52.12 et seq. that enables its holder to secure federal site approval for a
nuclear power plant site prior to seeking an operating reactor license from the United States Nuclear
Regulatory Commission;
(d) "Generation III Plus" means the generation of nuclear reactor design following Generation III that
incorporates passive and other safety measures and design improvements not included in previous
nuclear reactor designs;
(e) "Generation IV" means the nuclear reactor designs identified and selected by the Generation IV
International Forum as follows:
1. Sodium-cooled fast reactors;
2. Gas-cooled fast reactors;
3. Lead-cooled fast reactors;
4. Molten salt reactors;
5. Supercritical water-cooled reactors; and
6. Very high temperature reactors; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(f) "Nuclear energy generating facility" means a facility containing a nuclear reactor of Generation III
Plus, Generation IV, or later design that produces electricity, at least some of which is sold to the
public.
(2) (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon application by a regulated utility, the
commission may allow for the recovery of costs which are not covered in the existing rates of the
utility that have been incurred in applying for and procuring an early site permit, construction
permit, or combined operating license for a new nuclear energy generating facility to be located
within the Commonwealth.
(b) The commission shall not allow cost recovery under this section for any amounts that have been
offset by grant funding awarded pursuant to Section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. KRS 154.32-010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) "Activation date" means the date established in the tax incentive agreement that is within two (2) years of final
approval;
(2) "Affiliate" means the following:
(a) Members of a family, including only brothers and sisters of the whole or half blood, spouse, ancestors,
and lineal descendants of an individual;
(b) An individual, and a corporation more than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of
which is owned, directly or indirectly, by or for that individual;
(c) An individual, and a limited liability company of which more than fifty percent (50%) of the capital
interest or profits are owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by or for that individual;
(d) Two (2) corporations which are members of the same controlled group, which includes and is limited
to:
1. One (1) or more chains of corporations connected through stock ownership with a common
parent corporation if:
a. Stock possessing more than fifty percent (50%) of the total combined voting power of all
classes of stock entitled to vote or more than fifty percent (50%) of the total value of
shares of all classes of stock of each of the corporations, except the common parent
corporation, is owned by one (1) or more of the other corporations; and
b. The common parent corporation owns stock possessing more than fifty percent (50%) of
the total combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote or more than fifty
percent (50%) of the total value of shares of all classes of stock of at least one (1) of the
other corporations, excluding, in computing the voting power or value, stock owned
directly by the other corporations; or
2. Two (2) or more corporations if five (5) or fewer persons who are individuals, estates, or trusts
own stock possessing more than fifty percent (50%) of the total combined voting power of all
classes of stock entitled to vote or more than fifty percent (50%) of the total value of shares of all
classes of stock of each corporation, taking into account the stock ownership of each person only
to the extent the stock ownership is identical with respect to each corporation;
(e) A grantor and a fiduciary of any trust;
(f) A fiduciary of a trust and a fiduciary of another trust, if the same person is a grantor of both trusts;
(g) A fiduciary of a trust and a beneficiary of that trust;
(h) A fiduciary of a trust and a beneficiary of another trust, if the same person is a grantor of both trusts;
(i) A fiduciary of a trust and a corporation more than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock
of which is owned, directly or indirectly, by or for the trust or by or for a person who is a grantor of the
trust;
(j) A fiduciary of a trust and a limited liability company more than fifty percent (50%) of the capital
interest, or the interest in profits, of which is owned directly or indirectly, by or for the trust or by or for
a person who is a grantor of the trust;
(k) A corporation, a partnership, or a limited partnership if the same persons own:

CHAPTER 56 5
1. More than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of the corporation; and
2. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest, or the profits interest, in the partnership or
limited partnership;
(l) A corporation and a limited liability company if the same persons own:
1. More than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of the corporation; and
2. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or the profits in the limited liability
company;
(m) A partnership or limited partnership and a limited liability company if the same persons own:
1. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or profits in the partnership or limited
partnership; and
2. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or the profits in the limited liability
company;
(n) An S corporation and another S corporation if the same persons own more than fifty percent (50%) in
value of the outstanding stock of each corporation; S corporation designation being the same as that
designation under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(o) An S corporation and a C corporation, if the same persons own more than fifty percent (50%) in value
of the outstanding stock of each corporation; S and C corporation designations being the same as those
designations under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; or
(p) Two (2) or more limited liability companies, if the same persons own more than fifty percent (50%) of
the capital interest or are entitled to more than fifty percent (50%) of the capital profits in the limited
liability companies;
(3) "Agribusiness" means the processing of raw agricultural products, including but not limited to timber and
industrial hemp, or the performance of value-added functions with regard to raw agricultural products;
(4) "Alternative fuel production" means a Kentucky operation that primarily produces alternative transportation
fuels for sale. The alternative fuel production may produce electricity as a by-product if the primary function
of the operations remains the production and sale of alternative transportation fuels;
(5) "Alternative transportation fuels" has the same meaning as in KRS 152.715;
(6) "Approved company" means an eligible company that has received final approval to receive incentives under
this subchapter;
(7) "Approved costs" means the amount of eligible costs approved by the authority at final approval;
(8) "Authority" means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority established by KRS 154.20-010;
(9) "Biomass resources" has the same meaning as in KRS 152.715;
(10) "Capital lease" means a lease classified as a capital lease by the Statement of Financial Accounting Standards
No. 13, Accounting for Leases, issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board, November 1976, as
amended;
(11) "Carbon dioxide or hydrogen transmission pipeline" means the in-state portion of a pipeline, including
appurtenant facilities, property rights, and easements, that is used exclusively for the purpose of transporting
carbon dioxide or hydrogen to the point of sale, storage, or other carbon or hydrogen management
applications;
(12) "Coal severing and processing" means activities resulting in the eligible company being subject to the tax
imposed by KRS Chapter 143;
(13) "Commonwealth" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(14) "Confirmed approved costs" means:
(a) For owned economic development projects, the documented eligible costs incurred on or before the
activation date; or
(b) For leased economic development projects:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. The documented eligible costs incurred on or before the activation date; and
2. Estimated rent to be incurred by the approved company throughout the term of the tax incentive
agreement.
For both owned and leased economic development projects, "confirmed approved costs" may be less than
approved costs, but shall not be more than approved costs;
(15) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(16) "Economic development project" means:
(a) The acquisition, leasing, or construction of a new facility;
(b) The acquisition, leasing, rehabilitation, or expansion of an existing facility; or
(c) The installation and equipping of a facility;
by an eligible company. "Economic development project" does not include any economic development project
that will result in the replacement of facilities existing in the Commonwealth, except as provided in KRS
154.32-060;
(17) (a) "Eligible company" means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership,
sole proprietorship, business trust, or any other entity with a proposed economic development project
that is engaged in or is planning to be engaged in one (1) or more of the following activities within the
Commonwealth:
1. Manufacturing;
2. Agribusiness;
3. Nonretail service or technology;
4. Headquarters operations, regardless of the underlying business activity of the company;
5. Alternative fuel, gasification, energy-efficient alternative fuel, or renewable energy production;
6. Carbon dioxide or hydrogen transmission pipeline;
7. Coal severing and processing;[ or]
8. Hospital operations; or
9. Development of the nuclear energy ecosystem, including but not limited to nuclear energy
generating facility siting and development.
(b) "Eligible company" does not include companies where the primary activity to be conducted within the
Commonwealth is forestry, fishing, the provision of utilities, except as provided in paragraph (a)9. of
this subsection, construction, wholesale trade, retail trade, real estate, rental and leasing, educational
services, accommodation and food services, or public administration services;
(18) "Eligible costs" means:
(a) For owned economic development projects:
1. Start-up costs;
2. Nonrecurring obligations incurred for labor and nonrecurring payments to contractors,
subcontractors, builders, and materialmen in connection with the economic development project;
3. The cost of acquiring land or rights in land and any cost incidental thereto, including recording
fees;
4. The cost of contract bonds and of insurance of all kinds that may be required or necessary for
completion of an economic development project which is not paid by a contractor or otherwise
provided for;
5. All costs of architectural and engineering services, including test borings, surveys, estimated
plans and specifications, preliminary investigations, and supervision of construction, as well as
for the performance of all the duties required for construction of the economic development
project;

CHAPTER 56 7
6. All costs which are required to be paid under the terms of any contract for the economic
development project;
7. All costs incurred for construction activities, including site tests and inspections; subsurface site
work; excavation; removal of structures, roadways, cemeteries, and other surface obstructions;
filling, grading, and providing drainage and storm water retention; installation of utilities such as
water, sewer, sewage treatment, gas, electric, communications, and similar facilities; off-site
construction of utility extensions to the boundaries of the real estate; construction and installation
of railroad spurs as needed to connect the economic development project to existing railways; or
similar activities as the authority may determine necessary for construction of the economic
development project; and
8. All other costs of a nature comparable to those described above; and
(b) For leased economic development projects:
1. Start-up costs;
2. Building/leasehold improvements; and
3. Fifty percent (50%) of the estimated annual rent for each year of the tax incentive agreement.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, for economic development projects that are not in
enhanced incentive counties, the cost of equipment eligible for recovery as an eligible cost shall not exceed
twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each new full-time job created as of the activation date;
(19) "Employee benefits" means payments by an approved company for its full-time employees for health
insurance, life insurance, dental insurance, vision insurance, defined benefits, 401(k), or similar plans;
(20) "Energy-efficient alternative fuel production" means a Kentucky operation that produces for sale energy-
efficient alternative fuels;
(21) "Energy-efficient alternative fuels" means homogeneous fuels that:
(a) Are produced from processes designed to densify feedstock coal, waste coal, or biomass resources; and
(b) Have an energy content that is greater than the feedstock coal, waste coal, or biomass resource;
(22) "Enhanced incentive counties" means counties certified by the authority pursuant to KRS 154.32-050;
(23) "Final approval" means the action taken by the authority authorizing the eligible company to receive
incentives under this subchapter;
(24) (a) "Full-time job" means a job held by a person who:
1. Is required to work a minimum of thirty-five (35) hours per week; and
2. a. Is subject to the Kentucky individual income tax imposed by KRS 141.020; or
b. Works remotely away from the economic development project if the job meets all of the
following conditions:
i. Is held by a Kentucky resident;
ii. Was created as a result of the economic development project; and
iii. The payroll of this job is expensed to the economic development project.
(b) "Full-time job" does not include a job held by a resident of any state with a reciprocal agreement
between the Commonwealth and the other state as described in KRS 141.070;
(25) "Gasification process" means a process that converts any carbon-containing material into a synthesis gas
composed primarily of carbon monoxide and hydrogen;
(26) "Gasification production" means a Kentucky operation that primarily produces for sale:
(a) Alternative transportation fuels;
(b) Synthetic natural gas;
(c) Chemicals;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) Chemical feedstocks; or
(e) Liquid fuels;
from coal, waste coal, coal-processing waste, or biomass resources, through a gasification process. The
gasification production may produce electricity as a by-product if the primary function of the operations
remains the production and sale of alternative transportation fuels, synthetic natural gas, chemicals, chemical
feedstocks, or liquid fuels;
(27) "Headquarters" means the principal office where the principal executives of the entity are located and from
which other personnel, branches, affiliates, offices, or entities are controlled;
(28) "Hospital" means a facility licensed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services under KRS Chapter 216B
for the operation of a hospital and the basic services provided by a hospital;
(29) "Incentives" means the incentives available under this subchapter, as listed in KRS 154.32-020(3);
(30) "Job target" means the annual average number of new full-time jobs that the approved company commits to
create and maintain at the economic development project, which shall not be less than ten (10) new full-time
jobs;
(31) "Kentucky gross receipts" has the same meaning as in KRS 141.0401;
(32) "Kentucky gross profits" has the same meaning as in KRS 141.0401;
(33) "Lease agreement" means an agreement between an approved company and an unrelated entity conveying the
right to use a facility, the terms of which reflect an arms' length transaction. "Lease agreement" does not
include a capital lease;
(34) "Leased project" means an economic development project site occupied by an approved company pursuant to
a lease agreement;
(35) "Manufacturing" means any activity involving:
(a) Processing, assembling, or production of any property, including the processing resulting in a change in
the conditions of the property and any activity related to the processing, assembling, or production of
property, together with the storage, warehousing, distribution, and related office facilities; or
(b) Production of vital medications, personal protective equipment, or equipment necessary to produce
personal protective equipment;
(36) (a) "Nonretail service or technology" means any activity where service or technology is provided
predominantly outside the Commonwealth and designed to serve a multistate, national, or international
market.
(b) "Nonretail service or technology" includes but is not limited to call centers, centralized administrative
or processing centers, telephone or Internet sales order or processing centers, distribution or fulfillment
centers, data processing centers, research and development facilities, and other similar activities;
(37) "Owned project" means an economic development project owned in fee simple by the approved company or
an affiliate, or possessed by the approved company or an affiliate pursuant to a capital lease;
(38) "Personal protective equipment" means protective clothing, helmets, gloves, face shields, goggles, face masks,
respirators, and other equipment designed to protect the user from injury or the spread of infection or illness;
(39) "Preliminary approval" means the action taken by the authority preliminarily approving an eligible company
for incentives under this subchapter;
(40) "Renewable energy production" means a Kentucky operation that utilizes wind power, biomass resources,
landfill methane gas, hydropower, solar power, or other similar renewable resources to generate electricity for
sale to unrelated entities;
(41) "Rent" means the actual annual rent or fee paid by an approved company under a lease agreement;
(42) "Start-up costs" means nonrecurring costs incurred to furnish and equip a facility for an economic
development project, including costs incurred for:
(a) Computers, furnishings, office equipment, manufacturing equipment, and fixtures;
(b) The relocation of out-of-state equipment; and

CHAPTER 56 9
(c) Cost of fixed telecommunications equipment;
as certified to the authority in accordance with KRS 154.32-030;
(43) "Synthetic natural gas" means the same thing as in KRS 152.715;
(44) "Tax incentive agreement" means the agreement entered into pursuant to KRS 154.32-040 between the
authority and an approved company;
(45) "Term" means the period of time for which a tax incentive agreement may be in effect, which shall not exceed
fifteen (15) years for an economic development project located in an enhanced incentive county, or ten (10)
years for an economic development project not located in any other county;
(46) "Vital medications" means any drug or biologic used to prevent or treat a serious life-threatening disease or
medical condition for which there is no other available source with sufficient supply of that drug or biologic or
alternative drug or biologic;
(47) "Wage" means the per hour earnings of a full-time employee, including wages, tips, overtime, bonuses, and
commissions, as reflected on the employee's federal form W-2 wage and tax statement, but excludes employee
benefits; and
(48) "Wage target" means the average total hourly compensation amount, including the minimum wage and
employee benefits, that the approved company commits to meet for all new full-time jobs created and
maintained as a result of the economic development project, which shall not be less than:
(a) One hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the federal minimum wage in enhanced incentive counties;
or
(b) One hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage in all other counties.
Section 4. KRS 164.2802 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Nuclear Energy Development Authority is hereby established and attached to the University of
Kentucky Center for Applied Energy Research for administrative purposes. The mission of the Kentucky
Nuclear Energy Development Authority shall be to:
(a) Serve as the nonregulatory, trusted state government agency on nuclear energy issues and development
in the Commonwealth; and
(b) Support and facilitate the development of the nuclear energy ecosystem across the Commonwealth in a
collaborative manner that:
1. Enhances the Commonwealth's economy;
2. Offers energy production and economic development opportunities that are safe;
3. Protects the environment across the Commonwealth;
4. Supports community voices, especially in underrepresented or historically impacted areas;
5. Increases energy education; and
6. Prepares a future workforce.
(2) The Kentucky Nuclear Energy Development Authority shall be governed by an advisory board consisting of
the following twenty-two (22) voting members and eight (8) nonvoting members:
(a) Seven (7) state government members or their designees who shall be voting members:
1. The director of the University of Kentucky Center for Applied Energy Research, who shall serve
as chair;
2. The secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet;
3. The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development;
4. The chair of the Public Service Commission;
5. The president of the Council on Postsecondary Education;
6. The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
7. The director of the Division of Emergency Management;
(b) Fifteen (15) at-large members who shall be voting members:
1. A representative from each of the four (4) investor-owned electric utilities operating in the
Commonwealth, designated by the president of each investor-owned electric utility, unless two
(2) or more of the investor-owned electric utilities are operated under common ownership, in
which case only one (1) representative shall be designated for the commonly owned utilities;
2. Three (3) representatives of electric cooperatives designated by the chief operating officer of the
Kentucky Association of Electric Cooperatives, as follows:
a. One (1) of whom shall represent distribution cooperatives; and
b. Two (2) of whom shall represent each of the generation and transmission electric
cooperatives operating in the Commonwealth, unless they are operated under common
ownership, in which case only one (1) representative shall be designated for the
commonly owned generation and transmission electric cooperatives;
3. A representative of the Tennessee Valley Authority, designated by its chief nuclear officer;
4. A representative of municipal utilities, designated by the executive director of the Kentucky
League of Cities;
5. A representative of nuclear site remediation services, designated by the director of business
services for the Four Rivers Nuclear Partnership or by another organization that provides nuclear
site remediation services;
6. A representative for environmental interests, designated by the executive director of the
Kentucky Conservation Committee;
7. A representative of manufacturers, designated by the president of the Kentucky Association of
Manufacturers;
8. A representative for commercial interests, designated by the president of the Kentucky Chamber
of Commerce;
9. A mayor of a city, designated by the executive director of the Kentucky League of Cities, who
lives in an "energy community" as that term is used in the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022, Pub.
L. No. 117-169, and as it is defined in the latest guidance by the Internal Revenue Service; and
10. A county judge/executive, designated by the executive director of the Kentucky Association of
Counties, who lives in an "energy community" as that term is used in the Inflation Reduction Act
of 2022, Pub. L. No. 117-169, and as it is defined in the latest guidance by the Internal Revenue
Service; and
(c) Eight (8) nonvoting members:
1. The president of the Nuclear Energy Institute, or designee;
2. A representative from a national nuclear educational nonprofit organization, designated by the
chair and confirmed by a majority of the voting members;
3. A representative from a United States Department of Energy National Laboratory with expertise
in nuclear energy policy issues, designated by the chair and confirmed by a majority of the
voting members;
4. A representative from a nongovernmental nuclear policy advocacy organization, designated by
the chair and confirmed by a majority of the voting members;
5. Two (2) members of the Senate, who shall serve as ex officio members, designated by the
President of the Senate; and
6. Two (2) members of the House of Representatives, who shall serve as ex officio members,
designated by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(3) State government members named in subsection (2)(a) of this section and members of the General Assembly
named in subsection (2)(c)5. and 6. of this section shall serve on the advisory board during the terms of their
appointed or elected state government positions. After the initial appointments, all other members of the

CHAPTER 56 11
advisory board shall serve terms of four (4) years. Members shall be eligible to succeed themselves and shall
serve until their successors are appointed. A vacancy occurring during the term of any member shall be filled
in the same manner as the original appointment.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the advisory board shall constitute a quorum for the purposes of
conducting business. The advisory board shall meet at least quarterly, or more often at the call of the chair.
(5) Members of the advisory board shall not be paid for their service as board members, and they shall not be
reimbursed for any expenses relating to their attendance of board meetings.
(6) The advisory board shall hire a director of the authority who shall possess the skills and experience necessary
to lead the authority effectively, promote the safe and responsible development of nuclear energy, publicize
and encourage application to the Nuclear Energy Development Grant Program established in KRS 164.2803,
and achieve the authority's purposes described in subsection (8)[(7)] of this section.
(7) Beginning January 1, 2027, the authority shall provide to its advisory board members at least twenty (20)
hours of training each year in any area relating to nuclear energy generation, siting, or policy.
(8) The purposes of the authority shall be to:
(a) Assist interested communities in understanding advanced nuclear opportunities, including the
importance of secure, firm, cost-competitive power for customers and for economic development
opportunities, as well as the potential for direct and indirect economic benefits associated with the
employment and tax revenue generated from nuclear energy projects;
(b) Provide information to the public on the history of nuclear energy technologies in the Commonwealth,
the status of existing nuclear energy projects within the Commonwealth, and the potential benefits and
concerns associated with nuclear energy technologies;
(c) Develop the capacity for nuclear energy economic development in the Commonwealth, which shall
include providing information to educational institutions on the types of career opportunities that will
be available with the development of nuclear energy, building strong relationships with economic
development professionals, promoting existing economic development incentives applicable to nuclear
energy development, and seeking out new grants and other financial support for nuclear energy
development;
(d) Seek greater clarity and certainty with stakeholders on financial support for early nuclear site
permitting, the process for obtaining a nuclear power facility certificate of public convenience and
necessity, and the recovery of construction work in progress for nuclear energy projects;
(e) Work with communities that have previously hosted nuclear-related activities and other communities
facing a transition away from fossil fuels to empower those communities with the resources and
information necessary to engage with regulators, developers, and decisionmakers on new nuclear power
facilities, nuclear component manufacturing facilities, and fuel cycle facilities;
(f) Strengthen engagement with the federal Nuclear Regulatory Commission by reviewing current safety
and security practices implemented at different types of nuclear energy facilities under their purview,
promoting the streamlining of permitting efforts, and supporting the siting of interim and permanent
nuclear storage facilities via the continued use of consent-based siting;
(g) Build the organizational capacity to engage and potentially convene a consortium of stakeholders
interested in nuclear energy technologies that would consist of utilities, environmental advocates,
electric cooperatives, and major industrial companies in order to share best practices, including how to
share risk associated with developing and constructing new nuclear power plants within the
Commonwealth;
(h) Engage with the United States Department of Energy National Laboratories, academic institutions, and
private companies on efforts to develop deployable technologies to reprocess or recycle spent nuclear
fuel;
(i) Maintain awareness of potential events that could initiate or accelerate the development of new nuclear
energy technologies within the Commonwealth to allow the public to benefit from these projects;[ and]
(j) Through the nuclear energy development grant administration subcommittee, review and evaluate grant
applications and make grant awards in accordance with KRS 164.2803; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(k) Through the Nuclear Reactor Site Readiness Pilot Program, review and evaluate grant applications
and make recommendations to the General Assembly for funding eligible projects.
(9)[(8)] The authority, with the approval of the advisory board, shall:
(a) Propose and adopt bylaws for the management and operation of the authority, including for the Nuclear
Energy Development Grant Program established in KRS 164.2803;
(b) Develop and adopt a strategic plan for carrying out the purposes of the authority described in subsection
(8)[(7)] of this section;
(c) Create and update at least once every two (2) years a nuclear energy economic impact analysis for the
Commonwealth;
(d) Employ necessary staff to carry out the functions of the authority, including, subject to available
funding, third-party consultants with the subject matter expertise to assist as needed with the studies,
reviews, examinations, and recommendations for which the authority is responsible; and
(e) By December 1, 2025, and each December 1 thereafter, submit a report to the Governor and the
Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committees on Natural Resources
and Energy, Appropriations and Revenue, and Economic Development and Workforce Investment
providing:
1. A summary of the authority's activities and achievements since its last report;
2. The evaluations and scores of all nuclear energy development grant applications received and all
grant awards made pursuant to KRS 164.2803 since its last report;
3. The evaluations, scores, and funding recommendations for applicants to the Nuclear Reactor
Site Readiness Pilot Program established in Section 1 of this Act; and
4.[3.] Recommendations for the support and expansion of the nuclear energy ecosystem in the
Commonwealth.
Section 5. KRS 164.2803 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Nuclear Energy Development Authority established in KRS 164.2802 shall create and
implement the Nuclear Energy Development Grant Program for the advancement and location of nuclear
fission and fusion energy-related projects to support the entire nuclear energy ecosystem in the
Commonwealth, including utility and private sector economic development activities. The nuclear energy
ecosystem includes but is not limited to:
(a) The nuclear fuel cycle, which includes fuel conversion, enrichment, and fabrication, as well as potential
future spent fuel recycling and reprocessing;
(b) Nuclear fission or fusion reactor design and component manufacturing;
(c) Component supply chain manufacturing and distribution;
(d) Nuclear fission or fusion facility siting and development;
(e) Radioisotope production;
(f) Facility operation and maintenance;
(g) Decommissioning waste storage, transport, and management; and
(h) End uses of nuclear energy and co-products.
(2) The membership of the Kentucky Nuclear Energy Development Authority shall select five (5) of its voting
members to serve on the nuclear energy development grant administration subcommittee. A majority of the
members of the grant administration subcommittee shall constitute a quorum for the purposes of doing
business. The subcommittee shall:
(a) Create grant applications;
(b) Establish grant applicant eligibility requirements;
(c) Establish objective scoring criteria to evaluate grant applications, including but not limited to:

CHAPTER 56 13
1. The likelihood that the proposed project funded by the grant will precipitate further investment in
the nuclear energy ecosystem;
2. The economic impact of the grant funding on the community and region where the proposed
project will be located;
3. The readiness of the community where the proposed project will be located to host nuclear-
related investments, including whether the community has been awarded a nuclear-ready
community designation under KRS 164.2804; and
4. The amount of additional investment that would be made in the proposed project by the grant
applicant and other sources; and
(d) Make determinations on grant eligibility and funding and make grant awards based on those
determinations, not to exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000) per individual grant.
Signed by Governor April 8, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version